output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
иго/Fc
јасенец/Fd
кабачек/Fe
клати/Ff
ланјец/Fd
наклати/Ff
наскочити/Fg
нашептати/Fh
облачек/Fe
обсцати/Fi
обжегти/Fj
разклати/Ff
разжегти/Fj
језычек/Fe
заклати/Ff
уклати/Ff
жегти/Fj
сожегти/Fj
зажегти/Fj
шептати/Fh
сцати/Fi
насцати/Fi
шчекотати/Fh
лоскотати/Fh
